en: Dry shampoos
ar: شامبو جاف
az: Quru şampunlar
bg: Сухи шампоани
cs: Suché šampony
da: Tørshampoo
de: Trockenshampoos
el: Ξηρά σαμπουάν
es: Champús secos
et: Kuivšampoonid
fa: شامپو خشک
fi: Kuivashampoot
fr: Shampoings secs
ga: Seampúnna tirime
hr: Suhi šamponi
hu: Száraz samponok
hy: Չոր շամպուններ
id: Sampo kering
is: Þurrshampó
it: Shampoo secco
ja: ドライシャンプー
ka: მშრალი შამპუნები
kk: Құрғақ шампуньдер
ko: 드라이 샴푸
ky: Кургак шампунь
lt: Sausi šampūnai
lv: Sausie šampūni
mk: Суви шампони
ms: Syampu kering
mt: Xampù xott
nl: Droogshampoos
no: Tørrsjampo
pl: Suche szampony
pt: Champôs secos
ro: Șampoane uscate
ru: Сухие шампуни
sk: Suché šampóny
sl: Suhi šamponi
sq: Shampo thatë
sr: Суви шампони
sv: Torrschampo
sw: Shampoo kavu
tg: Шампуҳои хушк
th: แชมพูแห้ง
tk: Gury şampunlar
tr: Kuru şampuanlar
uk: Сухі шампуні
uz: Quruq shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội khô
zh: 干发香波

en: Shampoos for colored hair
ar: شامبو للشعر المصبوغ
az: Rənglənmiş saçlar üçün şampunlar
bg: Шампоани за боядисана коса
cs: Šampony pro barvené vlasy
da: Shampoo til farvet hår
de: Shampoo für coloriertes Haar
el: Σαμπουάν για βαμμένα μαλλιά
es: Champús para cabello teñido
et: Šampoonid värvitud juustele
fa: شامپو برای موهای رنگ شده
fi: Shampoot värjätyille hiuksille
fr: Shampoings pour cheveux colorés, Shampooings pour cheveux colorés
ga: Seampúnna do ghruaig daite
hr: Šamponi za obojenu kosu
hu: Sampon festett hajra
hy: Շամպուններ ներկված մազերի համար
id: Sampo untuk rambut diwarnai
is: Sjampó fyrir litað hár
it: Shampoo per capelli colorati
ja: カラーリングヘア用シャンプー
ka: შამპუნები შეღებილი თმისთვის
kk: Боялған шашқа арналған шампуньдер
ko: 염색 모발용 샴푸
ky: Боёлгон чачтар үчүн шампунь
lt: Šampūnai dažytiems plaukams
lv: Šampūni krāsotiem matiem
mk: Шампони за фарбана коса
ms: Syampu untuk rambut berwarna
mt: Xampù għal xagħar ikkulurit
nl: Shampoos voor geverfd haar
no: Sjampo for farget hår
pl: Szampony do włosów farbowanych
pt: Champôs para cabelos tingidos
ro: Șampoane pentru păr vopsit
ru: Шампуни для окрашенных волос
sk: Šampóny pre farbené vlasy
sl: Šamponi za barvane lase
sq: Shampo për flokë të lyer
sr: Шампони за фарбану косу
sv: Schampo för färgat hår
sw: Shampoo kwa nywele zilizopakwa rangi
tg: Шампунҳо барои мӯйҳои рангшуда
th: แชมพูสำหรับผมทำสี
tk: Reňklenen saçlar üçin şampunlar
tr: Boyalı saçlar için şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні для фарбованого волосся
uz: Bo'yalgan sochlar uchun shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội cho tóc nhuộm
zh: 染发洗发水

en: Shampoo for dry hair
ar: شامبو للشعر الجاف
az: Quru saçlar üçün şampunlar
bg: Шампоани за суха коса
cs: Šampony pro suché vlasy
da: Shampoo til tørt hår
de: Shampoo für trockenes Haar
el: Σαμπουάν για ξηρά μαλλιά
es: Champús para cabello seco
et: Šampoonid kuivadele juustele
fa: شامپو برای موهای خشک
fi: Kuivien hiusten shampoot
fr: Shampoings pour cheveux secs, Shampooings pour cheveux secs
ga: Seampúnna do ghruaig thirim
hr: Šamponi za suhu kosu
hu: Samponok száraz hajra
hy: Շամպուններ չոր մազերի համար
id: Sampo untuk rambut kering
is: Sjampó fyrir þurrt hár
it: Shampoo per capelli secchi
ja: ドライヘア用シャンプー
ka: შამპუნები მშრალი თმისთვის
kk: Құрғақ шашқа арналған шампуньдер
ko: 건성 모발용 샴푸
ky: Кургак чачтар үчүн шампунь
lt: Šampūnai sausiems plaukams
lv: Šampūni sausiem matiem
mk: Шампони за сува коса
ms: Syampu untuk rambut kering
mt: Xampù għal xagħar niexef
nl: Shampoos voor droog haar
no: Sjampo for tørt hår
pl: Szampony do włosów suchych
pt: Champôs para cabelos secos
ro: Șampoane pentru păr uscat
ru: Шампуни для сухих волос
sk: Šampóny pre suché vlasy
sl: Šamponi za suhe lase
sq: Shampo për flokë të thatë
sr: Шампони за суву косу
sv: Schampo för torrt hår
sw: Shampoo kwa nywele kavu
tg: Шампунҳо барои мӯйҳои хушк
th: แชมพูสำหรับผมแห้ง
tk: Gury saçlar üçin şampunlar
tr: Kuru saçlar için şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні для сухого волосся
uz: Quruq sochlar uchun shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội cho tóc khô
zh: 干性发质洗发水

en: Shampoos for oily hair
ar: شامبو للشعر الدهني
az: Yağlı saçlar üçün şampunlar
bg: Шампоани за мазна коса
cs: Šampony pro mastné vlasy
da: Shampoo til fedtet hår
de: Shampoo für fettiges Haar
el: Σαμπουάν για λιπαρά μαλλιά
es: Champús para cabello graso
et: Šampoonid rasustele juustele
fa: شامپو برای موهای چرب
fi: Shampoot rasvoittuville hiuksille
fr: Shampoings pour cheveux gras, Shampooings pour cheveux gras
ga: Seampúnna do ghruaig olacha
hr: Šamponi za masnu kosu
hu: Samponok zsíros hajra
hy: Շամպուններ յուղոտ մազերի համար
id: Sampo untuk rambut berminyak
is: Sjampó fyrir feitt hár
it: Shampoo per capelli grassi
ja: オイリーヘア用シャンプー
ka: შამპუნები ცხიმიანი თმისთვის
kk: Майлы шашқа арналған шампуньдер
ko: 지성 모발용 샴푸
ky: Майлуу чачтар үчүн шампунь
lt: Šampūnai riebiems plaukams
lv: Šampūni taukainiem matiem
mk: Шампони за мрсна коса
ms: Syampu untuk rambut berminyak
mt: Xampù għal xagħar żejtni
nl: Shampoos voor vet haar
no: Sjampo for fett hår
pl: Szampony do włosów przetłuszczających się
pt: Champôs para cabelos oleosos
ro: Șampoane pentru păr gras
ru: Шампуни для жирных волос
sk: Šampóny pre mastné vlasy
sl: Šamponi za mastne lase
sq: Shampo për flokë të yndyrshëm
sr: Шампони за масну косу
sv: Schampo för fett hår
sw: Shampoo kwa nywele zenye mafuta
tg: Шампунҳо барои мӯйҳои равғанӣ
th: แชมพูสำหรับผมมัน
tk: Ýagly saçlar üçin şampunlar
tr: Yağlı saçlar için şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні для жирного волосся
uz: Yog'li sochlar uchun shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội cho tóc dầu
zh: 油性发质洗发水

en: Anti-lice shampoos
ar: شامبو مضاد للقمل
az: Bit əleyhinə şampunlar
bg: Шампоани против въшки
cs: Šampony proti vším
da: Luseshampoo
de: Anti-Läuse Shampoos
el: Σαμπουάν κατά των ψειρών
es: Champús antipiojos
et: Täišampoonid
fa: شامپو ضد شپش
fi: Luteiden vastainen shampoo
fr: Shampoings antipoux
ga: Seampú frith-mhíol
hr: Šamponi protiv ušiju
hu: Tetűirtó sampon
hy: Ուլունքների դեմ շամպուններ
id: Sampo anti kutu
is: Lúsasjampó
it: Shampoo anti-pidocchi
ja: シラミ駆除シャンプー
ka: ტილების საწინააღმდეგო შამპუნები
kk: Битке қарсы шампуньдер
ko: 이 제거 샴푸
ky: Битке каршы шампунь
lt: Šampūnai nuo utėlių
lv: Šampūni pret utīm
mk: Шампони против вошки
ms: Syampu anti kutu
mt: Xampù kontra l-qamel
nl: Antiklit shampoo
no: Lusesjampo
pl: Szampony przeciw wszawicy
pt: Champôs anti-piolhos
ro: Șampoane anti-păduchi
ru: Шампуни против вшей
sk: Šampóny proti všiam
sl: Šamponi proti ušem
sq: Shampo kundër morrave
sr: Шампони против вашију
sv: Lusschampo
sw: Shampoo ya kuzuia chawa
tg: Шампуҳои зидди шапушак
th: แชมพูป้องกันเหา
tk: Bitiň garşysyna şampunlar
tr: Bit şampuanları
uk: Шампуні проти вошей
uz: Bitga qarshi shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội trị chấy
zh: 防虱洗发水

en: Anti-dandruff shampoos
ar: شامبو ضد القشرة
az: Kəpəyə qarşı şampunlar
bg: Шампоани против пърхот
cs: Šampony proti lupům
da: Skælshampoo
de: Anti-Schuppen-Shampoos
el: Σαμπουάν κατά της πιτυρίδας
es: Champús anticaspa
et: Kõõmavastased šampoonid
fa: شامپو ضد شوره
fi: Hilseilevät shampoot
fr: Shampoings anti-pelliculaires, Shampoings antipelliculaires, Shampooings anti-pelliculaires, Shampooings antipelliculaires
ga: Seampú frith-dandruff
hr: Šamponi protiv peruti
hu: Korpásodás elleni samponok
hy: Թեփի դեմ շամպուններ
id: Sampo anti ketombe
is: Flasa sjampó
it: Shampoo antiforfora
ja: ふけ防止シャンプー
ka: ქერტლის საწინააღმდეგო შამპუნები
kk: Қауызғаққа қарсы шампуньдер
ko: 비듬 방지 샴푸
ky: Какачты кетирүүчү шампунь
lt: Šampūnai nuo pleiskanų
lv: Šampūni pret blaugznām
mk: Шампони против првут
ms: Syampu anti kelemumur
mt: Xampù kontra l-brija
nl: Anti-roos shampoo
no: Flass sjampo
pl: Szampony przeciwłupieżowe
pt: Champôs anti-caspa
ro: Șampoane anti-mătreață
ru: Шампуни против перхоти
sk: Šampóny proti lupinám
sl: Šamponi proti prhljaju
sq: Shampo kundër zbokthit
sr: Шампони против перути
sv: Mjällschampo
sw: Shampoo ya kuzuia mba
tg: Шампунҳои зидди сабӯсак
th: แชมพูป้องกันรังแค
tk: Kepege garşy şampunlar
tr: Kepek önleyici şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні проти лупи
uz: Qazg'oqqa qarshi shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội trị gàu

en: Shampoos for children
ar: شامبو للأطفال
az: Uşaqlar üçün şampunlar
bg: Шампоани за деца
cs: Šampony pro děti
da: Shampoo til børn
de: Shampoos für Kinder
el: Σαμπουάν για παιδιά
es: Champús para niños
et: Šampoonid lastele
fa: شامپو برای کودکان
fi: Lasten shampoot
fr: Shampoings pour enfants, Shampooings pour enfants
hr: Šamponi za djecu
hu: Samponok gyerekeknek
hy: Շամպուններ երեխաների համար
id: Sampo untuk anak-anak
it: Shampoo per bambini
ja: 子供用シャンプー
ka: შამპუნები ბავშვებისთვის
kk: Балаларға арналған шампуньдер
ko: 어린이용 샴푸
ky: Балдар үчүн шампунь
lt: Šampūnai vaikams
lv: Šampūni bērniem
mk: Шампони за деца
ms: Syampu untuk kanak-kanak
mt: Xampù għat-tfal
nl: Shampoos voor kinderen
no: Sjampo for barn
pl: Szampony dla dzieci
pt: Champôs para crianças
ro: Șampoane pentru copii
ru: Шампуни для детей
sk: Šampóny pre deti
sl: Šamponi za otroke
sq: Shampo për fëmijë
sr: Шампони за децу
sv: Schampo för barn
sw: Shampoo kwa watoto
th: แชมพูสำหรับเด็ก
tk: Çagalar üçin şampunlar
tr: Çocuklar için şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні для дітей
uz: Bolalar uchun shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội cho trẻ em
zh: 儿童洗发水

en: Shampoos for babies
ar: شامبو للأطفال الرضع
az: Körpələr üçün şampunlar
bg: Шампоани за бебета
cs: Šampony pro kojence
da: Shampoo til babyer
de: Shampoos für Babys
el: Σαμπουάν για μωρά
es: Champús para bebés
et: Šampoonid beebidele
fa: شامپو برای نوزادان
fi: Vauvojen shampoot
fr: Shampoings pour bébé, Shampooings pour bébé
hr: Šamponi za bebe
hu: Samponok babáknak
hy: Շամպուններ նորածինների համար
id: Sampo untuk bayi
it: Shampoo per neonati
ja: 赤ちゃん用シャンプー
ka: შამპუნები ჩვილებისთვის
kk: Нәрестелерге арналған шампуньдер
ko: 아기 샴푸
ky: Ымыркайлар үчүн шампунь
lt: Šampūnai kūdikiams
lv: Šampūni zīdaiņiem
mk: Шампони за бебиња
ms: Syampu untuk bayi
mt: Xampù għat-trabi
nl: Shampoos voor baby's
no: Sjampo for babyer
pl: Szampony dla niemowląt
pt: Champôs para bebés
ro: Șampoane pentru bebeluși
ru: Шампуни для младенцев
sk: Šampóny pre bábätká
sl: Šamponi za dojenčke
sq: Shampo për foshnje
sr: Шампони за бебе
sv: Schampo för spädbarn
sw: Shampoo kwa watoto wachanga
th: แชมพูสำหรับเด็กทารก
tk: Körpeler üçin şampunlar
tr: Bebek şampuanları
uk: Шампуні для немовлят
uz: Go'daklar uchun shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội cho trẻ sơ sinh
zh: 婴儿洗发水

en: Natural extract shampoos
ar: شامبو بخلاصة طبيعية
az: Təbii ekstraktlı şampunlar
bg: Шампоани с натурални екстракти
cs: Šampony s přírodními výtažky
da: Shampoo med naturlige ekstrakter
de: Shampoos mit natürlichen Extrakten
el: Σαμπουάν με φυσικά εκχυλίσματα
es: Champús con extractos naturales
et: Looduslike ekstraktidega šampoonid
fa: شامپو با عصاره های طبیعی
fi: Luonnonuuteshampoot
fr: Shampooings aux extraits naturels
ga: Seampúnaí le sleachta nádúrtha
hr: Šamponi s prirodnim ekstraktima
hu: Természetes kivonatokat tartalmazó samponok
hy: Բնական մզվածքներով շամպուններ
id: Sampo ekstrak alami
is: Sjampó með náttúrulegum útdrætti
it: Shampoo con estratti naturali
ja: 天然抽出物配合シャンプー
ka: ნატურალური ექსტრაქტების შამპუნები
kk: Табиғи сығындылары бар шампуньдер
ko: 천연 추출물 샴푸
ky: Табигый экстракттары бар шампуньдар
lt: Šampūnai su natūraliais ekstraktais
lv: Šampūni ar dabīgiem ekstraktiem
mk: Шампони со природни екстракти
ms: Syampu dengan ekstrak semula jadi
mt: Xampù b'estratti naturali
nl: Shampoos met natuurlijke extracten
no: Sjampo med naturlige ekstrakter
pl: Szampony z naturalnymi ekstraktami
pt: Champôs com extratos naturais
ro: Șampoane cu extracte naturale
ru: Шампуни с натуральными экстрактами
sk: Šampóny s prírodnými výťažkami
sl: Šamponi z naravnimi izvlečki
sq: Shampoo me ekstrakte natyrale
sr: Шампони са природним екстрактима
sv: Schampon med naturliga extrakt
sw: Shampoo zenye dondoo asilia
tg: Шампунҳои дорои экстрактҳои табиӣ
th: แชมพูผสมสารสกัดจากธรรมชาติ
tk: Tebigy ekstraktly şampunlar
tr: Doğal özlü şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні з натуральними екстрактами
uz: Tabiiy ekstraktli shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội có chiết xuất tự nhiên
zh: 天然提取物洗发水

en: Linden shampoos
ar: شامبو بخلاصة الزيزفون
az: Şampunlar cövhəri ilə
bg: Шампоани с екстракт от липа
bn: লিন্ডেন নির্যাস সহ শ্যাম্পু
ca: Xampús amb extracte de til·ler
cs: Šampony s lipovým extraktem
da: Shampoo med lind ekstrakt
de: Shampoos mit Lindenblütenextrakt
el: Σαμπουάν με εκχύλισμα φλαμουριάς
es: Champús con extracto de tilo
et: Pärnaekstraktiga šampoonid
fa: شامپو با عصاره درخت لیندن
fi: Sampoot, joissa on lehmusuutetta
fr: Shampooings au tilleul
ga: Seampú le sliocht tilia
he: שמפו עם תמצית טיליה
hr: Šamponi s ekstraktom lipe
hu: Hárskivonatot tartalmazó samponok
hy: Շամպուններ լորենու մզվածքով
id: Sampo dengan ekstrak linden
is: Sjampó með lindenuppdrátt
it: Shampoo con estratto di tiglio
ja: シナノキ抽出物配合シャンプー
ka: შამპუნები ცაცხვის ექსტრაქტით
kk: Жусан сығындысы бар шампуньдер
km: សាប៊ូកក់សក់ជាមួយសារធាតុចម្រាញ់ពី Linden
ko: 보리수 추출물 샴푸
ky: Липа экстракты кошулган шампунь
lt: Šampūnai su liepų ekstraktu
lv: Šampūni ar liepu ekstraktu
mk: Шампони со екстракт од липа
ms: Syampu dengan ekstrak linden
mt: Xampù bl-estratt tal-linden
nl: Shampoos met lindebloesemextract
no: Sjampo med lind ekstrakt
pl: Szampony z ekstraktem z lipy
pt: Champôs com extrato de tília
ro: Șampoane cu extract de tei
ru: Шампуни с экстрактом липы
sk: Šampóny s lipovým extraktom
sl: Šamponi z izvlečkom lipe
sq: Shampo me ekstrakt të blirit
sr: Шампони са екстрактом липе
sv: Schampon med lindextrakt
sw: Shampoo na dondoo la linden
tg: Шампунҳо бо иқтибоси линден
th: แชมพูที่มีสารสกัดจาก Linden
tk: Lipa ekstrakty bilen şampunlar
tr: Ihlamur özlü şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні з екстрактом липи
ur: لنڈن کے عرق کے ساتھ شیمپو
uz: Linden ekstrakti bilan shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội có chiết xuất từ cây Linden
zh: 菩提树提取物洗发水

en: Nettle shampoos
fr: Shampooings à l'ortie

en: Lemon balm shampoos
fr: Shampooings à la mélisse

en: Chamomile shampoos
fr: Shampooings à la camomille

en: Honey shampoos
fr: Shampooings au miel, shampooings au miel de fleurs

en: Fortifying shampoos
ar: شامبو مقوي
az: Möhkəmləndirici şampunlar
bg: Подсилващи шампоани
cs: Posilující šampony
da: Styrkende shampooer
de: Kräftigende Shampoos
el: Ενισχυτικά σαμπουάν
es: Champús fortificantes
et: Tugevdavad šampoonid
fa: شامپوهای تقویت کننده
fi: Vahvistavat shampoot
fr: Shampooing fortifiant
ga: Seampú neartaithe
hr: Jačanje šampona
hu: Erősítő samponok
hy: Ամրացնող շամպուններ
id: Sampo penguat
is: Styrkjandi sjampó
it: Shampoo fortificante
ja: 強化シャンプー
ka: გამაძლიერებელი შამპუნები
kk: Нығайтатын шампуньдер
ko: 강화 샴푸
ky: Бекемдөөчү шампуньдар
lt: Stiprinantys šampūnai
lv: Stiprinoši šampūni
mk: Зајакнувачки шампони
ms: Syampu menguatkan
mt: Xampù li jsaħħaħ
nl: Versterkende shampoos
no: Styrkende sjampoer
pl: Szampony wzmacniające
pt: Champôs fortificantes
ro: Șampoane fortifiante
ru: Укрепляющие шампуни
sk: Posilňujúce šampóny
sl: Krepilni šamponi
sq: Shampoo forcues
sr: Шампони за јачање
sv: Stärkande schampon
sw: Shampoo za kuimarisha
tg: Шампунҳои мустаҳкамкунанда
th: แชมพูเสริมความแข็งแรง
tk: Güýçlendiriji şampunlar
tr: Güçlendirici şampuanlar
uk: Зміцнюючі шампуні
uz: Mustahkamlovchi shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội tăng cường sức mạnh
zh: 强韧洗发水

en: Untangling shampoos, Detangling shampoos
ar: شامبو فك التشابك
az: Düyün açan şampunlar
bg: Шампоани за разплитане
cs: Šampony pro rozčesávání
da: Shampoo til udredning
de: Entwirr-Shampoos
el: Σαμπουάν ξεμπερδέματος
es: Champús desenredantes
et: Pusade harutamise šampoonid
fa: شامپوهای باز کننده گره
fi: Selvittävät shampoot
fr: Shampooing démêlant
ga: Seampú dí-thadhlaí
hr: Šamponi za raščešljavanje
hu: Kibontó samponok
hy: Մազերը հեշտ սանրելու համար նախատեսված շամպուններ
id: Sampo pengurai rambut kusut
is: Sjampó til að greiða úr flækjum
it: Shampoo districante
ja: もつれをほぐすシャンプー
ka: შამპუნები კულულების გასასწორებლად
kk: Шашты ағытатын шампуньдер
ko: 엉킴 방지 샴푸
ky: Чачты чечүүчү шампуньдар
lt: Šampūnai lengvinantys iššukavimą
lv: Šampūni matu atšķetināšanai
mk: Шампони за расчешлување
ms: Syampu menguraikan rambut
mt: Xampù li jħoll ix-xagħar
nl: Ontwarrende shampoos
no: Sjampo for floker
pl: Szampony ułatwiające rozczesywanie
pt: Champôs desembaraçantes
ro: Șampoane pentru descurcarea părului
ru: Шампуни для распутывания волос
sk: Šampóny na rozčesávanie
sl: Šamponi za razčesavanje
sq: Shampo për krehje të lehtë
sr: Шампони за рашчишћавање
sv: Schampo för att reda ut tovor
sw: Shampoo za kufungua mafundo
tg: Шампунҳои кушодани гиреҳҳо
th: แชมพูแก้ผมพันกัน
tk: Saçy aňsat çözmek üçin şampunlar
tr: Saç açıcı şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні для розплутування волосся
uz: Sochni oson tarash uchun shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội gỡ rối tóc
zh: 柔顺洗发水

en: Anti-dryness shampoos
ar: شامبو مضاد للجفاف
az: Quruluğa qarşı şampunlar
bg: Шампоани против изсушаване
cs: Šampony proti vysoušení
da: Shampoo mod udtørring
de: Shampoos gegen Austrocknung
el: Σαμπουάν κατά της ξηρότητας
es: Champús anti-sequedad
et: Kuivusevastased šampoonid
fa: شامپو ضد خشکی
fi: Kuivumista estävät shampoot
fr: Shampooings anti-dessèchement
ga: Seampú frith-thriomú
hr: Šamponi protiv isušivanja
hu: Szárazság elleni samponok
hy: Չորության դեմ շամպուններ
id: Sampo anti kekeringan
is: Sjampó gegn þurrki
it: Shampoo anti-secchezza
ja: 乾燥防止シャンプー
ka: შამპუნები გამოშრობის წინააღმდეგ
kk: Құрғаққа қарсы шампуньдер
ko: 건조 방지 샴푸
ky: Кургактыкка каршы шампунь
lt: Šampūnai nuo sausumo
lv: Šampūni pret sausumu
mk: Шампони против сушење
ms: Syampu anti kekeringan
mt: Xampù kontra n-nixfa
nl: Anti-droogshampoos
no: Sjampo mot tørrhet
pl: Szampony przeciw wysuszaniu
pt: Champôs anti-secura
ro: Șampoane anti-uscare
ru: Шампуни против сухости
sk: Šampóny proti vysúšaniu
sl: Šamponi proti izsuševanju
sq: Shampo kundër tharjes
sr: Шампони против исушивања
sv: Schampo mot torrhet
sw: Shampoo ya kuzuia ukavu
tg: Шампунҳо барои пешгирии хушкӣ
th: แชมพูป้องกันผมแห้ง
tk: Guraklyga garşy şampunlar
tr: Kuruluğa karşı şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні проти сухості
uz: Quruqlikka qarshi shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội chống khô
zh: 防干燥洗发水

en: Anti-hair loss shampoos
ar: شامبو ضد تساقط الشعر
az: Saç tökülməsinə qarşı şampunlar
bg: Шампоани против косопад
cs: Šampony proti vypadávání vlasů
da: Shampoo mod hårtab
de: Shampoos gegen Haarausfall
el: Σαμπουάν κατά της τριχόπτωσης
es: Champús anticaída
et: Juuste väljalangemise vastased šampoonid
fa: شامپو ضد ریزش مو
fi: Hiustenlähtöä ehkäisevät shampoot
fr: Shampooings anti-chute
ga: Seampúnna frith-chaillteanas gruaige
hr: Šamponi protiv ispadanja kose
hu: Hajhullás elleni samponok
hy: Մազաթափման դեմ շամպուններ
id: Sampo anti rambut rontok
is: Sjampó gegn hárlosi
it: Shampoo anticaduta
ja: 抜け毛防止シャンプー
ka: თმის ცვენის საწინააღმდეგო შამპუნები
kk: Шаш түсуге қарсы шампуньдер
ko: 탈모 방지 샴푸
ky: Чач түшүүгө каршы шампунь
lt: Šampūnai nuo plaukų slinkimo
lv: Šampūni pret matu izkrišanu
mk: Шампони против опаѓање на коса
ms: Syampu anti keguguran rambut
mt: Xampù kontra t-telf ta' xagħar
nl: Anti-haaruitval shampoos
no: Sjampo mot hårtap
pl: Szampony przeciw wypadaniu włosów
pt: Champôs antiqueda
ro: Șampoane anti-cădere
ru: Шампуни против выпадения волос
sk: Šampóny proti vypadávaniu vlasov
sl: Šamponi proti izpadanju las
sq: Shampo kundër rënies së flokëve
sr: Шампони против опадања косе
sv: Schampo mot håravfall
sw: Shampoo ya kuzuia upotezaji wa nywele
tg: Шампунҳо барои пешгирии рехтани мӯй
th: แชมพูป้องกันผมร่วง
tk: Saç dökülmesine garşy şampunlar
tr: Saç dökülmesine karşı şampuanlar
uk: Шампуні проти випадіння волосся
uz: Soch to'kilishiga qarshi shampunlar
vi: Dầu gội chống rụng tóc
zh: 防脱发香波

en: Hair care
ar: العناية بالشعر
az: Saça qulluq
bg: Грижа за косата
bn: চুলের যত্ন
ca: Cura del cabell
cs: Péče o vlasy
da: Hårpleje
de: Haarpflege
el: Περιποίηση μαλλιών
es: Cuidado del cabello
et: Juuksehooldus
fa: مراقبت از مو
fi: Hiustenhoito
fr: Soins cheveux, Soin cheveux
ga: Cúram gruaige
he: טיפוח שיער
hr: Njega kose
hu: Hajápolás
hy: Մազերի խնամք
id: Perawatan rambut
is: Hárgreiðsla
it: Cura dei capelli
ja: ヘアケア
ka: თმის მოვლა
kk: Шаш күтімі
km: ការថែរក្សាសក់
ko: 헤어 케어
ky: Чачты күтүү
lt: Plaukų priežiūra
lv: Matu kopšana
mk: Нега на коса
ms: Penjagaan rambut
mt: Kura tax-xagħar
nl: Haarverzorging
no: Hårpleie
pl: Pielęgnacja włosów
pt: Cuidados com o cabelo
ro: Îngrijirea părului
ru: Уход за волосами
sk: Starostlivosť o vlasy
sl: Nega las
sq: Kujdesi për flokët
sr: Нега косе
sv: Hårvård
sw: Utunzaji wa nywele
tg: Нигоҳубини мӯй
th: การดูแลเส้นผม
tk: Saç idegi
tr: Saç bakımı
uk: Догляд за волоссям
ur: بالوں کی دیکھ بھال
uz: Soch parvarishi
vi: Chăm sóc tóc
zh: 头发护理

en: Hair masks
ar: أقنعة الشعر
az: Saç maskaları
bg: Маски за коса
bn: চুলের মাস্ক
ca: Màscares per al cabell
cs: Vlasové masky
da: Hårmasker
de: Haarmasken
el: Μάσκες μαλλιών
es: Mascarillas para el cabello
et: Juuksemaskid
fa: ماسک مو
fi: Hiusnaamiot
fr: Masques capillaires, masques pour cheveux
ga: Mascanna gruaige
he: מסכות שיער
hr: Maske za kosu
hu: Hajmaszkok
hy: Մազի դիմակներ
id: Masker rambut
is: Hármaskar
it: Maschere per capelli
ja: ヘアマスク
ka: თმის ნიღბები
kk: Шашқа арналған маскалар
km: ម៉ាសសក់
ko: 헤어 마스크
ky: Чач маскалары
lt: Plaukų kaukės
lv: Matu maskas
mk: Маски за коса
ms: Topeng rambut
mt: Maskri tax-xagħar
nl: Haarmaskers
no: Hårmasker
pl: Maski do włosów
pt: Máscaras capilares
ro: Măști de păr
ru: Маски для волос
sk: Vlasové masky
sl: Maske za lase
sq: Maskë për flokë
sr: Маске за косу
sv: Hårmasker
sw: Maski za nywele
tg: Ниқобҳои мӯй
th: มาส์กผม
tk: Saç maskalary
tr: Saç maskeleri
uk: Маски для волосся
ur: بالوں کے ماسک
uz: Soch maskalari
vi: Mặt nạ tóc
zh: 发膜